Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 2460.
Civil investigation.

The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney, whenever he or she has reason to believe any person to be or to have been in violation of section 2453 of this title, or of any rule or regulation made pursuant to section 2453 of this title, may examine or cause to be examined by any agent or representative designated by him or her for that purpose, any books, records, papers, memoranda, and physical objects of whatever nature bearing upon each alleged violation, and may demand written responses under oath to questions bearing upon each alleged violation.
(a) (1) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney, whenever he or she has reason to believe any person to be or to have been in violation of section 2453 of this title, or of any rule or regulation made pursuant to section 2453 of this title, may examine or cause to be examined by any agent or representative designated by him or her for that purpose, any books, records, papers, memoranda, and physical objects of whatever nature bearing upon each alleged violation, and may demand written responses under oath to questions bearing upon each alleged violation.

The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may require the attendance of such person or of any other person having knowledge in the premises in the county where the person resides or has a place of business, or in Washington County if the person is a nonresident or has no place of business, within the State, may take testimony and require proof material for his or her information, and may administer oaths or take acknowledgment in respect of any book, record, paper, or memorandum.

The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney shall serve notice of the time, place, and cause of the examination or attendance, or notice of the cause of the demand for written responses, at least 10 days prior to the date of the examination, personally or by certified mail, upon the person at his or her principal place of business, or, if the place is not known, to his or her last known address.

Any book, record, paper, memorandum, or other information produced by any person pursuant to this section shall not, unless otherwise ordered by a court of this State for good cause shown, be disclosed to any person other than the authorized agent or representative of the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney or another law enforcement officer engaged in legitimate law enforcement activities, unless with the consent of the person producing the same.

This subsection shall not be applicable to any criminal investigation or prosecution brought under the laws of this or any state.

A person upon whom a notice is served pursuant to the provisions of this section shall comply with the terms thereof unless otherwise provided by the order of a court of this State.
(b) (1) A person upon whom a notice is served pursuant to the provisions of this section shall comply with the terms thereof unless otherwise provided by the order of a court of this State.

Any person who, with intent to avoid, evade, or prevent compliance, in whole or in part, with any civil investigation under this section, removes from any place, conceals, withholds, or destroys, mutilates, alters, or by any other means falsifies any documentary material in the possession, custody, or control of any person subject of any such notice, or mistakes or conceals any information, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $25,000.00 and to recovery by the Attorney General’s or State’s Attorney’s office the reasonable value of its services and expenses in enforcing compliance with this section.

Whenever any person fails to comply with any notice served upon him or her under this section or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction of material pursuant to this section cannot be done and the person refuses to surrender the material, the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may file, in the Superior Court in which the person resides or has his or her principal place of business, or in Washington County if the person is a nonresident or has no principal place of business in this State, and serve upon the person, a petition for an order of the court for the enforcement of this section.
(c) (1) Whenever any person fails to comply with any notice served upon him or her under this section or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction of material pursuant to this section cannot be done and the person refuses to surrender the material, the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may file, in the Superior Court in which the person resides or has his or her principal place of business, or in Washington County if the person is a nonresident or has no principal place of business in this State, and serve upon the person, a petition for an order of the court for the enforcement of this section.

Whenever a petition is filed under this section, the court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine the matter presented and to enter one or more orders as may be required to carry into effect the provisions of this section.

A person who violates an order entered under this section by a court shall be punished for contempt of court and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $25,000.00 and to recovery by the Attorney General’s or State’s Attorney’s office of the reasonable value of its services and expenses in enforcing compliance with this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1969, No. 45

, § 6, eff. April 4, 1969;

1973, No. 110

, § 4;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1997, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. Jan. 1, 1998;

2013, No. 44

, § 5.

§ 2461.
Civil penalty.

Any person who violates the terms of an injunction issued under section 2458 of this title shall forfeit and pay to the State a civil penalty of not more than $10,000.00 for each violation. For the purposes of this section, the court issuing such injunction shall retain jurisdiction, and the cause shall be continued, and in such cases the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney acting in the name of the State may petition for recovery of such civil penalty.

Any consumer who contracts for goods or services in reliance upon false or fraudulent representations or practices prohibited by section 2453 of this title, or who sustains damages or injury as a result of any false or fraudulent representations or practices prohibited by section 2453 of this title, or prohibited by any rule or regulation made pursuant to section 2453 of this title, may sue for appropriate equitable relief and may sue and recover from the seller, solicitor, or other violator the amount of his or her damages, or the consideration or the value of the consideration given by the consumer, reasonable attorney’s fees, and exemplary damages not exceeding three times the value of the consideration given by the consumer. Any language, written or oral, used by a seller or solicitor, that attempts to exclude or modify recovery of the penalty or reasonable attorney’s fees shall be unenforceable.

Any person alleged to have violated the terms of subsection (b) of this section shall be entitled to a trial by jury, unless waived according to law.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1969, No. 45

, § 7, eff. April 4, 1969;

1971, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1973, No. 110

, § 5.

Particular cases.

For-sale-by-owner publication had not plausibly alleged a Vermont Consumer Protection Act claim based on unfair or deceptive practices as it was a competitor to the realty website owner, not a consumer. Picket Fence Preview, Inc. v. Zillow, Inc., — F. Supp. 3d —, 2021 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 156854 (D. Vt. Aug. 19, 2021).

Plaintiffs’ claim under the Consumer Protection Act with regard to defendant’s certification of a wastewater disposal system failed because defendant was not directly involved in the sales transaction, but simply sent the certification to the Vermont Agency of Natural Resources. Glassford v. Dufresne & Assocs., P.C., 2015 VT 77, 199 Vt. 422, 124 A.3d 822, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 57 (2015).

As inn buyers clearly knew the information about the need to replace the roof, the realtor’s failure to provide the seller’s estimate of repair costs to them could not satisfy the requirements for liability under the Consumer Protection Act for purposes of a private cause of action. PH West Dover Prop. v. Lalancette Eng'rs, 2015 VT 48, 199 Vt. 1, 120 A.3d 1135, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 28 (2015).

Home buyer’s private consumer fraud claim against a realtors’ association failed when the association’s only act was to draft the template clauses that the buyer and her broker used in the purchase and sales contract. Knutsen v. Dion, 2013 VT 106, 195 Vt. 512, 90 A.3d 866, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 107 (2013).

Borrowers’ private consumer fraud claim against a bank failed because the borrowers had not established an injury for the purposes of standing. Even if the bank could not enforce either the note or the mortgage, the borrowers were still liable on the note and mortgage, either to another or to the bank after it had cured any deficiency that stood in the way of its enforcement. Dernier v. Mortgage Network, Inc., 2013 VT 96, 195 Vt. 113, 87 A.3d 465, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 99 (2013).

Even if a statement that any shortfall in a real estate broker’s commission would come out of the share of an employee who was the sellers’ friend violated the Consumer Fraud Act as an unfair debt collection practice, the sellers had not shown that they sustained damages or injury as a result. Lang McLaughry Spera Real Estate, LLC v. Hinsdale, 2011 VT 29, 190 Vt. 1, 35 A.3d 100, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 36 (2011).

§ 2461a.
Hearing aid violations.

The Attorney General shall investigate alleged irregularities and complaints relating to the fitting and selling of hearing aids, in violation of 18 V.S.A. chapter 90, and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 95

, § 2.

§ 2461b.
Regulation of propane.

In this section:
(a) (1) In this section:

“Consumer” means any person who, for consumption and not for resale, purchases propane through a meter or has propane delivered to one or more storage tanks of 2,000 gallons or less.

“Seller” means a person who sells or offers to sell propane to a consumer.

“Terminates service” means that a seller:

disconnects, removes, or locks off that seller’s propane tank;

reads a meter with the purpose of terminating service; or

takes other action that evidences an intent to terminate a service relationship with a consumer or evidences knowledge that the consumer requested termination of service.

The Attorney General shall investigate irregularities, complaints, and unfair or deceptive acts in commerce by sellers.

For the purpose of promoting business practices that are uniformly fair to sellers and that protect consumers, the Attorney General shall adopt necessary rules, including notice prior to disconnection, repayment agreements, minimum delivery, discrimination, security deposits, and the assessment of fees and charges.

A violation of this section, or a rule adopted under this section not inconsistent with this section, shall constitute an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
(c) (1) A violation of this section, or a rule adopted under this section not inconsistent with this section, shall constitute an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.

No contract for propane services shall contain any provision that conflicts with the obligations and remedies established by this section or by any rule adopted under this section, and any conflicting provision shall be unenforceable and void.

A seller shall not:

assess a minimum usage fee;

assess a fee for propane that is not actually delivered to a consumer; or

require a consumer to purchase a minimum number of gallons of propane per year, except as part of a guaranteed price plan that meets the requirements of section 2461e of this title.

When terminating service to a consumer, a seller shall comply with the following requirements:

If the propane storage tank has been located on the consumer’s premises, regardless of ownership of the premises, for 12 months or more, the seller may not assess a fee related to termination of propane service, including a fee:
(1) (A) If the propane storage tank has been located on the consumer’s premises, regardless of ownership of the premises, for 12 months or more, the seller may not assess a fee related to termination of propane service, including a fee:

If a consumer has received propane service from the seller for less than 12 months, any fee related to termination of service may not exceed the disclosed price of labor and materials.

(i)

to remove the seller’s storage tank from the premises;

(ii)

to pump out or restock propane; or

(iii)

to terminate service.

Subject to subdivision (h)(5) of this section:

Within 20 days of the date when the seller terminates service or is notified by the consumer in writing that service has been disconnected, whichever is earlier, the seller shall refund to the consumer the amount paid by the consumer for any propane remaining in the storage tank, less any payments due the seller from the consumer.

If the quantity of propane remaining in the storage tank cannot be determined with certainty, the seller shall, within the 20 days described in subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection, refund to the consumer the amount paid by the consumer for 80 percent of the seller’s best reasonable estimate of the quantity of propane remaining in the tank, less any payments due from the consumer. The seller shall refund the remainder of the amount due as soon as the quantity of propane left in the tank can be determined with certainty, but no later than 14 days after the removal of the tank or restocking of the tank at the time of reconnection.

Any refund to the consumer shall be by cash, check, direct deposit, credit to a credit card account, or in the same method or manner of payment that the consumer, or a third party on the consumer’s behalf, used to make payments to the seller.
(3) (A) Any refund to the consumer shall be by cash, check, direct deposit, credit to a credit card account, or in the same method or manner of payment that the consumer, or a third party on the consumer’s behalf, used to make payments to the seller.

Unless requested by the consumer, a seller shall not provide a refund in the form of a reimbursement or credit to any account with the seller.

If the seller fails to mail or deliver a refund to the consumer in accordance with this subsection, the seller shall within one business day make a penalty payment to the consumer, in addition to the refund, of:

$250.00 on the first day after the refund was due; and

$75.00 per day for each day thereafter until the refund and penalty payment have been mailed or delivered, provided that the total amount that accrues under this subdivision (B) shall not exceed 10 times the amount of the refund.

Termination of service does not void any guaranteed price plan that meets the requirements of section 2461e of this title that has not expired by its own terms.

A seller of propane shall not refuse to deliver propane to a storage tank owned by a consumer if the consumer provides proof of ownership of the tank and the seller has conducted a safety check of the tank in accordance with NFPA 54 (National Fuel Gas Code) and NFPA 58 (Storage and Handling of Liquefied Petroleum Gas Code) of the National Fire Protection Association and complies with rules adopted by the Attorney General governing propane.
(f) (1) A seller of propane shall not refuse to deliver propane to a storage tank owned by a consumer if the consumer provides proof of ownership of the tank and the seller has conducted a safety check of the tank in accordance with NFPA 54 (National Fuel Gas Code) and NFPA 58 (Storage and Handling of Liquefied Petroleum Gas Code) of the National Fire Protection Association and complies with rules adopted by the Attorney General governing propane.

If a seller of propane chooses to finance a consumer’s purchase of a storage tank, the financing shall be a retail installment sale as provided in chapter 61 of this title.

Nonpayment of the following charges may be the only basis for an interruption or disconnection of service: propane, leak or pressure test, safety check, restart of equipment, after-hours delivery, special trip for delivery, and meter read.

A seller who has a duty to remove a propane storage tank from a consumer’s premises shall remove the tank within 20 days or, in the case of an underground storage tank, within 30 days of the earliest of the following dates:
(h) (1) A seller who has a duty to remove a propane storage tank from a consumer’s premises shall remove the tank within 20 days or, in the case of an underground storage tank, within 30 days of the earliest of the following dates:

the date on which the consumer requests termination of service;

the date the seller disconnects propane service; or

the date on which the seller is notified by the consumer in writing that service has been disconnected.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, if a consumer requests that a tank be removed on a specific day, the seller shall remove the tank no more than 10 days after the date requested, or within the period required by subdivision (1) of this subsection, whichever is later.

A seller who fails to remove a propane storage tank in accordance with this subsection shall make a penalty payment to the consumer of:

$250.00 on the first day after the tank should have been removed; and

$75.00 per day for each day thereafter until the tank has been removed and the penalty payments have been mailed or delivered, provided that the total amount that accrues under this subdivision (B) shall not exceed $2,000.00.

Notwithstanding subdivision (3) of this subsection, no penalty shall be due for the time a seller is unable to remove a tank due to weather or other conditions not caused by the seller that bar access to the tank, if the seller provides within five days of the latest date the tank was otherwise required to be removed:
(4) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (3) of this subsection, no penalty shall be due for the time a seller is unable to remove a tank due to weather or other conditions not caused by the seller that bar access to the tank, if the seller provides within five days of the latest date the tank was otherwise required to be removed:

a written explanation for the delay;

what reasonable steps the consumer must take to provide access to the tank; and

a telephone number, a mailing address, and an e-mail address the consumer can use to notify the seller that the steps have been taken.

The seller shall have 20 days from the date he or she receives the notice from the consumer required in subdivision (4)(A)(iii) of this subsection to remove the tank.

A consumer who prevents access to a propane storage tank, such that a seller is unable to timely remove the tank from the property or determine the amount of propane remaining in the tank in compliance with this section, shall not be entitled to a refund for propane remaining in the storage tank pursuant to subsection (e) of this section until the consumer takes the reasonable steps identified by the seller that are necessary to allow access to the tank and provides notice to the seller that he or she has taken those steps, in compliance with the process established in subdivision (4) of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 34

, § 2; amended

2011, No. 47

, § 19a, eff. May 25, 2011;

2013, No. 44

, § 1;

2013, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 24, 2014;

2015, No. 23

, § 90.

§ 2461c.
Predatory pricing.

No person, with the intent to harm competition, shall price goods or services in a manner that tends to create or maintain a monopoly or otherwise harms competition. A violation of this subsection is deemed to be an unfair method of competition in commerce and a violation of section 2453 of this title.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that in construing subsection (a) of this section, the courts of the State will be guided by similar terms contained in federal anti-trust law as construed by the courts of the United States and as amended by Congress.

The Attorney General shall adopt rules when necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this section. The rules shall not be inconsistent with the rules, regulations, and decisions of the Federal Trade Commission or with the decisions of the courts of the United States construing federal anti-trust law.

The Attorney General has the same authority to conduct civil investigations and enter into assurances of discontinuance as provided under subchapter 1 of this chapter.

A person aggrieved by a violation of this section or a violation of rules adopted under this section may bring an action in Superior Court for appropriate relief under subsection 2461(b) of this title.

This section shall not be construed to limit rights or remedies available to a person under any other law.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 35

, § 1; amended

2017, No. 74

, § 14.

§ 2461d.
Price gouging of petroleum products and heating fuel products.

Definitions For the purposes of this section:

A “market emergency” shall be declared by the Governor. The market emergency shall continue for 30 days or until terminated by the Governor. The Governor may extend the market emergency for additional 30-day periods. “Market emergency” means any abnormal disruption of any market for petroleum products or heating fuel products, including any actual or threatened shortage in the supply of petroleum products or heating fuel products or any actual or threatened increase in the price of petroleum products or heating fuel products resulting from severe weather, convulsion of nature, supply manipulation, failure or shortage of electric power or other source of energy, strike, civil disorder, act of war, terrorist attack, national or local emergency, or other extraordinary adverse circumstances.

“Petroleum or heating fuel product” means motor fuels, liquefied petroleum gas, fuel oil, kerosene, and wood pellets used for heating or cooking purposes.

“Petroleum or heating fuel-related business” means any producer, supplier, wholesaler, distributor, or retail seller of any petroleum or heating fuel product.

It is an unfair and deceptive act and practice in commerce and a violation of section 2453 of this title for any petroleum or heating fuel-related business during a market emergency or seven days prior thereto to sell or offer to sell any petroleum product or heating fuel product for an amount that represents an unconscionably high price.

A price is unconscionably high if:

the amount charged during the market emergency or seven days prior thereto represents a gross disparity between the price of the petroleum product or heating fuel product charged by the petroleum or heating fuel related business and:

the price at which the same product was sold or offered for sale by that business in the usual course of business immediately prior to the date of the declaration of the market emergency; or

the price at which the same or similar petroleum product or heating fuel product is readily obtainable by the buyer and other buyers in the trade area in which the petroleum- or heating-fuel-related business markets the product; and

the disparity is not substantially attributable to increased prices charged by the petroleum product or heating fuel product suppliers or increased costs due to a market emergency.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 210

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2461e.
Requirements for guaranteed price plans and prepaid contracts.

Contract and solicitation requirements.

A contract for the retail sale of home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas that offers a guaranteed price plan, including a fixed price contract, a prepaid contract, a cost-plus contract, and any other similar terms, shall be in writing, and the terms and conditions of such price plans shall be disclosed. Such disclosure shall be in plain language and shall immediately follow the language concerning the price or service that could be affected and shall be printed in no less than 12-point boldface type of uniform font. A solicitation for the retail sale of home heating oil or liquefied petroleum gas that offers a guaranteed price plan that could become a contract upon a response from a consumer, including a fixed price contract, a prepaid contract, a cost-plus contract, and any other similar terms, shall be in writing, and the terms and conditions of such offer shall be disclosed in plain language.

Subdivision (1) of this subsection does not preclude a first come, first served offering.

Security for prepaid contracts.

No home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas dealer shall enter into a prepaid contract to provide home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas to a consumer unless that dealer has, within seven days of the acceptance of the contract, obtained and maintained any one of the following:

Futures contract. Heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas contracts or other similar commitments that allow the dealer to purchase, at a fixed price, heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas in an amount not less than 75 percent of the maximum number of gallons that the dealer is committed to deliver pursuant to all prepaid contracts entered into by the dealer.

Surety bond. A surety bond in an amount not less than 50 percent of the total amount of funds paid to the dealer by consumers pursuant to prepaid heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas contracts.

Line of credit, letter of credit, cash. A line of credit from an FDIC-insured institution, letter of credit from an FDIC-insured institution, cash in an FDIC-insured account or a functionally equivalent account, or combination thereof in an amount that represents 100 percent of the cost to the dealer of the maximum number of gallons that the dealer is committed to deliver pursuant to all prepaid contracts entered into by the dealer. The cost shall be calculated at the time the contracts are entered into.

A dealer shall maintain the amount of futures contracts required by this subsection for the period of time for which the prepaid home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas contracts are effective, except that the amount of the futures contracts may be reduced during such period of time to reflect any amount of home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas already delivered to and paid for by the consumer.

Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply to budget plans under which consumers pay 1/12th of their yearly heating fuel cost each month.

Disclosure; additional contract requirements. A prepaid home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas contract shall indicate:
(c) (1) Disclosure; additional contract requirements. A prepaid home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas contract shall indicate:

the amount of funds paid by the consumer to the dealer under the contract;

the maximum number of gallons of home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas committed by the dealer for delivery to the consumer pursuant to the contract; and

that the performance of the prepaid contract is secured by one of the three options described in subsection (b) of this section.

Reimbursement default provision. Any contract described in this subsection shall provide that the contract price of any undelivered home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas owed to the consumer under the contract at the end date of the contract shall be reimbursed to the consumer not later than 30 days after the end date of the contract, unless the parties to the contract agree otherwise.

Private right of action under Consumer Protection Act. In addition to the remedies set forth in sections 2458 and 2461 of this title, a home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas dealer may bring an action against its heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas suppliers for failing to honor its contract with the home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas dealer. The home heating oil, kerosene, or liquefied petroleum gas dealer bringing the action may recover all remedies available to consumers under subsection 2461(b) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 210

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2011, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 8, 2012;

2011, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 1a, eff. May 18, 2012;

2013, No. 44

, § 3.

§ 2462.
Action by State’s Attorney.

Any State’s Attorney receiving notice of any alleged violation of this chapter shall immediately forward written notice of the same with any other information he or she may have to the “Office of the Attorney General, Attention Consumer Protection Division.”

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1973, No. 110

, § 6.

§ 2463.
Credit billing for certain home solicitation sales.

In the case of any home solicitation sale solicited or consummated by a seller in whole or in part by telephone that is paid for by means of an open-end consumer credit plan within the meaning of the federal Truth-in-Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq., the issuer of the credit card on which the consumer has charged the purchase shall, for one year from the date of the sale, or within any other time period available under applicable network operating rules in effect at the time of the sale, whichever is greater, and for the purpose of a disputed charge and reimbursement to the consumer, be subject to the claim or defense that the seller failed to comply with the disclosure requirements of subsection 2454(b) of this chapter and engaged in a related unfair or deceptive act or practice under subsection 2453(a) of this title, regardless of the amount of the purchase, the location of the seller, or the amount, if any, already paid by the consumer. Where a consumer has raised such a claim or defense, the issuer shall not report any negative information on the purchase to any consumer reporting agency as defined in the Fair Credit Reporting Act,

15 U.S.C. § 1681a

(f), unless there is a judicial determination that the consumer’s defense or claim is without merit, except that the issuer may report that there is a dispute with respect to the charge.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 99

, § 4; amended

2011, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 18, 2013.

§ 2463a.
Choice of law in computer information agreement.

A choice of law provision in a computer information agreement that provides that the contract is to be interpreted pursuant to the laws of a state that has enacted the Uniform Computer Information Transactions Act, as proposed by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws or any substantially similar law, is voidable, and the agreement shall be interpreted pursuant to the laws of this State if the party against whom enforcement of the choice of law provisions is sought is a resident of this State or has its principal place of business located in this State. For purposes of this section, a “computer information agreement” means an agreement that would be governed by the Uniform Computer Information Transactions Act or substantially similar law as enacted in the state specified in the choice of law provisions if that state’s law were applied to the agreement. This section may not be varied by agreement of the parties. This section shall remain in force until such time as the General Assembly enacts the Uniform Computer Information Transactions Act or any substantially similar law and that law becomes effective.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 44

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

§ 2464.
Telemarketing transactions.

For the purposes of this section:

“Express oral authorization” means that a consumer has explicitly authorized an electronic funds transfer from his or her financial account for goods or services offered by a telemarketer:

during a telephone call in which the telemarketer has clearly stated that the consumer is authorizing the transfer from his or her account and has further stated the consumer’s name, a description of the specific goods or services offered, any material terms of the transaction, the date on or after which the account will be debited, the amount of the transfer, a telephone number for consumer inquiries that is answered during normal business hours, and the date of the authorization; and

where the telemarketer has either tape-recorded the entire telemarketing call on which the consumer has authorized the transaction and not disposed of the recording until at least four years after the authorization or has provided written notice to the consumer, prior to the settlement date of the transfer, confirming the terms of the authorization as described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1) and has not disposed of the written notice until at least four years after the notice was created. Isolated and inadvertent failure to comply with this record-keeping requirement shall not give rise to liability under this subsection, provided that the telemarketer has in place reasonable procedures designed to comply with this requirement.

“Financial account” means a checking, savings, share, or other depository account.

“Process” includes printing a check, draft, or other form of negotiable instrument drawn on or debited against a consumer’s financial account, formatting or transferring data for use in connection with the debiting of a consumer’s account by means of such an instrument or an electronic funds transfer, or arranging for such services to be provided to a telemarketer.

“Telemarketer” means any person who initiates telephone calls to, or who receives telephone calls from, a consumer in connection with a plan, program, or campaign to market goods or services. The term “telemarketer” does not include:

a federally insured depository institution or its subsidiary when it obtains or submits for payment a check, draft, or other form of negotiable instrument drawn on or debited against a person’s checking, savings, share, or other depository account at that institution;

any person that submits a payment when the consumer authorizing the submission has, prior to July 1, 1997, entered into a written contract with the person for the issuance of a charge or credit card;

any person who initiates telephone calls to or who receives telephone calls from a consumer in connection with collection of an amount due for goods or services previously provided to the consumer;

any company registered with and regulated by the Public Utility Commission;

any other category of persons that the Attorney General may exempt by rule consistent with the purposes of this section.

It is an unfair and deceptive act and practice in commerce for any telemarketer directly or through an agent:

to procure the services of any third-party delivery, courier, or other pickup service to obtain a consumer’s payment for goods, unless the goods are delivered at the time that the consumer’s payment is obtained by the courier;

to obtain or submit for payment a check, draft, or other form of negotiable instrument drawn on a person’s financial account without the consumer’s prior written authorization or to dispose of the written authorization until at least four years after the authorization; or

to obtain funds from a person’s financial account by means of an electronic funds transfer unless:

the consumer has initiated the telephone call to the telemarketer; or
(A) (i) the consumer has initiated the telephone call to the telemarketer; or

the telemarketer and the consumer have a current written agreement for the provision of goods or services or the consumer has purchased goods or services from the telemarketer within the previous two years; and

the telemarketer has obtained the consumer’s express oral authorization to the transfer prior to initiating the debit.

It is an unfair and deceptive act and practice in commerce for a party other than a federally insured depository institution to process for payment from a consumer’s financial account, in connection with a telemarketer’s transaction with the consumer:

a check, draft, or other form of negotiable instrument drawn on or debited against such account without the consumer’s prior written authorization; or

an electronic funds transfer from such account for goods or services offered by a telemarketer, unless:

the consumer has initiated the telephone call to the telemarketer; or
(A) (i) the consumer has initiated the telephone call to the telemarketer; or

the telemarketer and the consumer have a current written agreement for the provision of goods or services or the consumer has purchased goods or services from the telemarketer within the previous two years; and

the telemarketer has obtained the consumer’s express oral authorization to the transfer prior to initiating the debit.

In addition to the legal liability described in subsection (c) of this section, it is an unfair and deceptive act and practice in commerce for any person, including a third-party delivery, courier, or other pickup service, or the telemarketer’s financial institution as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 10202(5)

, but not including the consumer’s financial institution as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 10202(5)

, to provide substantial assistance to a telemarketer in violation of subsection (b) of this section when the person or the person’s authorized agent knows or consciously avoids knowing that the telemarketer is engaging in an unfair or deceptive act or practice in commerce.

It is an unfair and deceptive act and practice in commerce for a party other than a federally insured depository institution who processes a telemarketing transaction for payment from a consumer’s financial account to:

fail to obtain, before processing the transaction, any prior written authorization required by subdivision (b)(2) of this section or any tape recording or copy of a written confirmation required by subdivision (b)(3) of this section as part of the consumer’s express oral authorization; or

dispose of a document required by subdivision (1) of this subsection, or of telemarketer applications or agreements, records of payments processed or returned, electronic communications relating to telemarketers, consumer complaints, or any other category of record that the Attorney General may prescribe by rule, until at least four years after the records were created.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 42

, § 2; amended

2005, No. 5

, § 1;

2007, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2-5.